Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.020

Purposes specified.

The purposes of development credit corporations as authorized herein shall be: (1) To promote, aid, and, through the united efforts of the institutions and corporations which shall from time to time become members thereof, develop and advance the industrial and business prosperity and welfare of the state of Washington; (2) To encourage new industries; (3) To stimulate and help to expand all kinds of business ventures which tend to promote the growth of the state; (4) To act whenever and wherever deemed by it advisable in conjunction with other organizations, the objects of which are the promotion of industrial, agricultural or recreational developments within the state; and (5) To furnish for approved and deserving applicants ready and required money for the carrying on and development of every kind of business or industrial undertaking whereby a medium of credit is established not otherwise readily available therefor.

[ 1959 c 213 s 2.]